Hawaii statutes.
§187A-13 General penalty. (a) Any
person violating this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder for which a
penalty is not otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and,
in addition to any other penalties, shall be fined not less than:

(1) $250 for a first offense;

(2) $500 for a second offense; and

(3) $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense.

(b) The fines specified in this section shall
not be suspended or waived. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 195, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next